New Mexico, session 2026, HB48.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--Two million dollars ($2,000,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the board of regents of the New Mexico institute of mining and technology for expenditure in fiscal year 2027 for seismology equipment and to expand monitoring network capabilities in the bureau of geology and mineral resources of the New Mexico institute of mining and technology, in partnership with the oil conservation division of the energy, minerals and natural resources department. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -